Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 3. GUARDIANSHIP AND RELATED PROCEDURES

SUBTITLE E. ADMINISTRATION OF GUARDIANSHIP

CHAPTER 1153. NOTICE TO CLAIMANTS

Sec. 1153.001. REQUIRED NOTICE REGARDING PRESENTMENT OF CLAIMS IN GENERAL. (a) Within one month after receiving letters of guardianship, a guardian of an estate shall provide notice requiring each person who has a claim against the estate to present the claim within the period prescribed by law. The notice must be:

(1) published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the letters were issued; and

(2) sent to the comptroller by a qualified delivery method, if the ward remitted or should have remitted taxes administered by the comptroller.

(b) Notice provided under Subsection (a) must include:

(1) the date the letters of guardianship were issued to the guardian of the estate;

(2) the address to which a claim may be presented; and

(3) an instruction of the guardian's choice that the claim be addressed in care of:

(A) the guardian;

(B) the guardian's attorney; or

(C) "Guardian, Estate of ____________" (naming the estate).

(c) If there is no newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the letters of guardianship were issued, the notice must be posted and the return made and filed as otherwise required by this title.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 521 (S.B. 626), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 785), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1153.002. PROOF OF PUBLICATION. A copy of the published notice required by Section 1153.001(a)(1), with the publisher's affidavit, sworn to and subscribed before a proper officer, to the effect that the notice was published as provided in this title for the service of citation or notice by publication, shall be filed in the court in which the cause is pending.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1153.003. REQUIRED NOTICE TO CERTAIN CLAIMANTS. (a) Within four months after receiving letters of guardianship, the guardian of an estate shall give notice of the issuance of the letters to each person who has a claim for money against the ward's estate:

(1) that is secured by a deed of trust, mortgage, or vendor's, mechanic's, or other contractor's lien on real estate belonging to the estate; or

(2) about which the guardian has actual knowledge.

(b) Notice provided under this section must be:

(1) sent by a qualified delivery method; and

(2) addressed to the record holder of the claim at the record holder's last known post office address.

(c) The following shall be filed in the court from which the letters of guardianship were issued:

(1) a copy of each notice required by Subsection (a)(1) with the return receipt or other proof of delivery, if available; and

(2) the guardian's affidavit stating:

(A) that the notice was sent as required by law; and

(B) the name of the person to whom the notice was sent, if that name is not shown on the notice or receipt.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (H.B. 785), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1153.004. PERMISSIVE NOTICE TO UNSECURED CREDITOR REGARDING PERIOD FOR PRESENTMENT OF CLAIM. The guardian of the estate may expressly state in a notice given to an unsecured creditor under Section 1153.003(a)(2) that the creditor must present a claim not later than the 120th day after the date the creditor receives the notice or the claim is barred, if the claim is not barred by the general statutes of limitation. A statement under this section must include:

(1) the address to which the claim may be presented; and

(2) an instruction that the claim be filed with the clerk of the court that issued the letters of guardianship.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1153.005. ONE NOTICE SUFFICIENT; LIABILITY FOR FAILURE TO GIVE REQUIRED NOTICE. (a) A guardian of an estate is not required to give a notice required by Section 1153.001 or 1153.003 if another person also appointed as guardian or a former guardian has given that notice.

(b) If the guardian fails to give a notice required by other sections of this title or to cause the notice to be given, the guardian and the sureties on the guardian's bond are liable for any damage a person suffers because of the neglect, unless it appears that the person otherwise had notice.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 207 (S.B. 1457), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2023.